Utah statutes.
32A-11a-106.   Prohibited conduct of wholesaler.
(1)  A wholesaler may not:
(a)  induce, coerce, or attempt to induce or coerce, any retailer to engage in
any illegal act or course of conduct;
(b)  impose a requirement that is discriminatory by its terms or in the
methods of enforcement as compared to requirements imposed by the wholesaler
on similarly situated retailers;
(c)  prohibit a retailer from selling the product of any other wholesaler;
(d)  fix or maintain the price at which a retailer may resell beer;
(e)  require any retailer to accept delivery of any beer or any other item
that is not voluntarily ordered by the retailer;
(f)  restrict or inhibit, directly or indirectly, the right of a retailer to
participate in an organization representing interests of retailers for any
lawful purpose;
(g)  require a retailer to participate in or contribute to any local,
regional, or national advertising fund or other promotional activity;
(h)  retaliate against a retailer that files a complaint with the department
or the applicable federal agency regarding an alleged violation by the
wholesaler of a state or federal law or administrative rule; and
(i)  refuse to deliver beer products carried by the wholesaler to a properly
licensed retailer who resides within the wholesaler's sales territory:
(i)  in reasonable quantities; and
(ii)  within a reasonable time after receipt of the retailer's order.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(i), the wholesaler may refuse to deliver
products if the refusal is due to:
(a)  the retailer's failure to pay the wholesaler pursuant to Subsection
32A-12-603(7);
(b)  an unforeseeable event beyond the wholesaler's control;
(c)  a work stoppage or delay due to a strike or labor problem;
(d)  a bona fide shortage of materials; or
(e)  a freight embargo.
